Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2249
Directory of appraisers; information; distribution.

(1) The board may prepare a directory showing the name, place of business, and effective and expiration dates for credentials of credential holders under the Real Property Appraiser Act which may be made available on the board's website. Printed copies of the directory shall be made available to the public at such reasonable price per copy as may be fixed by the board. The directory shall be provided to federal authorities as required by the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.

(2) The board shall provide without charge to any credential holder under the Real Property Appraiser Act a set of rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board and any other information which the board deems important in the area of real property appraisal in this state. The information may be made available electronically or printed in a booklet, a pamphlet, or any other form the board determines appropriate. The board may update such material as often as it deems necessary. The board may provide such material to any other person upon request and may charge a fee for the material. The fee shall be reasonable and shall not exceed any reasonable or necessary costs of producing the material for distribution.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 49;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 53;

Laws 1993, LB 842, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 46;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 41;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 69;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 16;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 24;

Laws 2012, LB714, § 11;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 25;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 69;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 18.